Illinois, session 104th, SB4068.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Insurance Code is amended by 5changing Section 356z.60 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 5/356z.60)7    Sec. 356z.60. Coverage for abortifacients, hormonal 8therapy, and human immunodeficiency virus pre-exposure 9prophylaxis and post-exposure prophylaxis.10    (a) As used in this Section:11    "Abortifacients" means any medication administered to 12terminate a pregnancy as prescribed or ordered by a health 13care professional.14    "Health care professional" means a physician licensed to 15practice medicine in all of its branches, licensed advanced 16practice registered nurse, or physician assistant.17    "Hormonal therapy medication" means hormonal treatment 18administered to treat gender dysphoria.19    "Therapeutic equivalent version" means drugs, devices, or 20products that can be expected to have the same clinical effect 21and safety profile when administered to patients under the 22conditions specified in the labeling and that satisfy the 23following general criteria:  SB4068- 2 -LRB104 19356 BAB 32804 b1        (1) it is approved as safe and effective;2        (2) it is a pharmaceutical equivalent in that it:3            (A) contains identical amounts of the same active 4        drug ingredient in the same dosage form and route of 5        administration; and6            (B) meets compendial or other applicable standards 7        of strength, quality, purity, and identity;8        (3) it is bioequivalent in that:9            (A) it does not present a known or potential 10        bioequivalence problem and it meets an acceptable in 11        vitro standard; or12            (B) if it does present such a known or potential 13        problem, it is shown to meet an appropriate 14        bioequivalence standard;15        (4) it is adequately labeled; and16        (5) it is manufactured in compliance with Current Good 17    Manufacturing Practice regulations adopted by the United 18    States Food and Drug Administration.19    (b) An individual or group policy of accident and health 20insurance amended, delivered, issued, or renewed in this State 21on or after January 1, 2024 shall provide coverage for all 22abortifacients, hormonal therapy medication, human 23immunodeficiency virus pre-exposure prophylaxis, and 24post-exposure prophylaxis drugs approved by the United States 25Food and Drug Administration, and follow-up services related 26to that coverage, including, but not limited to, management of   SB4068- 3 -LRB104 19356 BAB 32804 b1side effects, medication self-management or adherence 2counseling, risk reduction strategies, and mental health 3counseling. This coverage shall include drugs approved by the 4United States Food and Drug Administration that are prescribed 5or ordered for off-label use for the purposes described in 6this Section. On and after the effective date of this 7amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, this coverage 8shall include screenings for pre-PrEP HIV and sexually 9transmitted infections. The coverage shall also include kidney 10function analysis, routine laboratory testing, and routine 11provider visits associated with those screenings.12    (c) The coverage required under subsection (b) is subject 13to the following conditions:14        (1) If the United States Food and Drug Administration 15    has approved one or more therapeutic equivalent versions 16    of an abortifacient drug, a policy is not required to 17    include all such therapeutic equivalent versions in its 18    formulary so long as at least one is included and covered 19    without cost sharing and in accordance with this Section.20        (2) If an individual's attending provider recommends a 21    particular drug approved by the United States Food and 22    Drug Administration based on a determination of medical 23    necessity with respect to that individual, the plan or 24    issuer must defer to the determination of the attending 25    provider and must cover that service or item without cost 26    sharing.  SB4068- 4 -LRB104 19356 BAB 32804 b1        (3) If a drug is not covered, plans and issuers must 2    have an easily accessible, transparent, and sufficiently 3    expedient process that is not unduly burdensome on the 4    individual or a provider or other individual acting as a 5    patient's authorized representative to ensure coverage 6    without cost sharing.7    The conditions listed under this subsection (c) also apply 8to drugs prescribed for off-label use as abortifacients. 9    (d) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, a policy 10subject to this Section shall not impose a deductible, 11coinsurance, copayment, or any other cost-sharing requirement 12on the coverage provided. The provisions of this subsection do 13not apply to coverage of procedures to the extent such 14coverage would disqualify a high-deductible health plan from 15eligibility for a health savings account pursuant to the 16federal Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. 223.17    (e) Except as otherwise authorized under this Section, a 18policy shall not impose any restrictions or delays on the 19coverage required under this Section.20    (f) The coverage requirements in this Section for 21abortifacients do not, pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18054(a)(6), 22apply to a multistate plan that does not provide coverage for 23abortion.24    (g) If the Department concludes that enforcement of any 25coverage requirement of this Section for abortifacients may 26adversely affect the allocation of federal funds to this   SB4068- 5 -LRB104 19356 BAB 32804 b1State, the Department may grant an exemption to that 2requirement, but only to the minimum extent necessary to 3ensure the continued receipt of federal funds.4(Source: P.A. 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23; 103-462, eff. 8-4-23.) 5    Section 10. The Prior Authorization Reform Act is amended 6by adding Section 52 as follows: 7    (215 ILCS 200/52 new)8    Sec. 52. Prior authorization for certain prescription 9drugs; prohibited. A health insurance issuer may not require 10prior authorization for the following prescription drug types 11and their therapeutic equivalents approved by the United 12States Food and Drug Administration: human immunodeficiency 13virus pre-exposure prophylaxis and post-exposure prophylaxis 14medication or human immunodeficiency virus treatment 15medication. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 171, 2028.